Tennessee, session 114, HB0396.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 13-3-603(f), is amended by deleting
the language "in perpetuity" and substituting instead "for at least thirty (30) years".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0396
001608
- 1 -